Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 2. Revenue Bond Power Districts

§ 37-7-201.
Petition for organization; assessments against real estate.

If the petition for the organization of a power district under W.S.

37-7-101

, states that the bonds to be issued by such district for the purpose of raising money shall be a lien only upon the power plant, distribution system, and other property used in the manufacture or distribution of electrical energy, and upon the revenues from electrical energy so developed or distributed, the petition or petitions of fifty (50) freeholders of the area to be served shall be sufficient to give the court jurisdiction to hear such petition, and to organize a power district; provided, no district organized under a petition providing such revenue bonds only, shall have authority to make any assessments against the real estate of the district, unless it shall amend its petition and follow the procedure provided in W.S.

37-7-101

.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 51, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 62-201; W.S. 1957, § 37-108; Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to authority of power districts to borrow money and issue bonds generally, see §§

37-7-126

,

37-7-127

.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “W.S.

37-7-101

” for “section 87-101, Wyoming Revised Statutes, 1931” twice.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cited

in

In re Organization of Sheridan County Power Dist., 61 Wyo. 365, 157 P.2d 997,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1945).

§ 37-7-202.
Bonds issued only when authorized by district court; hearing and notice; interest rate; conditions of sale.

Power districts organized pursuant to petitions stating that the bonds to be issued by the district for the purpose of raising money shall be a lien only upon the power plant, distribution system and other property used in the manufacture or distribution of electrical energy, and upon the revenues from electrical energy so developed or distributed, may issue bonds only when so authorized by the district court having jurisdiction thereof, and the bonds shall not be offered for sale to the public generally unless the court shall so provide in its order. Commissioners of a district desiring to issue bonds, shall first present to the court a full showing of the necessity and proposed conditions of the bonds, and, after giving such notice as the court may require to all parties interested, the court shall hear the petition and make orders fixing the terms and conditions of bond issue as shall to the court seem proper. Bonds shall not be sold at less than ninety percent (90%) of their par value.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 51, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 62-202; W.S. 1957, § 37-109; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 33; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to legal rate of interest, see § 40-14-106(e).

§ 37-7-203.
W.S. 37-7-201 through 37-7-212 to be cumulative authority; existing laws not repealed.

This act [§§

37-7-201

through

37-7-212

] shall be construed as cumulative authority for the purposes named in sections 1 [§

37-7-201

] and 2 [§

37-7-202

] hereof, and as to the manner and form of issuing revenue bonds for any such purpose or purposes, and shall not be construed to repeal any existing laws with respect thereto, it being the purpose and intention of this act to create an additional and alternate method for the purposes herein named.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 51, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 62-203; W.S. 1957, § 37-110.

§ 37-7-204.
Payment of principal and interest to be from revenues only; not to constitute indebtedness of borrower.

The principal of and interest upon such bonds shall be payable solely from the revenues derived from the operation of the power system or plant, electric light plant, power plant, power lines, transmission lines, or power distributing systems, for the purchase, construction, improvement, enlargement, extension, or repair of which the same are issued. No bond or coupon issued pursuant to this act [§§

37-7-201

through

37-7-212

] shall constitute an indebtedness of such borrower within the meaning of any state constitutional provision or statutory limitation. It shall be plainly stated on the face of each such bond and coupon that the same has been issued under the provisions of this act and that it does not constitute an indebtedness of such borrower within any state constitutional provision or statutory limitation.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 51, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 62-204; W.S. 1957, § 37-111.

§ 37-7-205.
Bonds a mortgage lien for benefit of bond and coupon holders.

Said bonds shall be construed to and shall create a statutory mortgage lien upon any such power system, power plant, electric light plant, power lines, transmission lines, or power distributing system or systems, and the appurtenances and extensions thereto so to be purchased, constructed, improved, enlarged, extended or repaired, to and in favor of the holders of said bonds and each of them and to and in favor of the holders of the coupons of said bonds, and each of them.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 51, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 62-205; W.S. 1957, § 37-112.

§ 37-7-206.
System to remain subject to mortgage lien; proceedings to compel performance of official duties; forced sale not authorized.

Such system so purchased, constructed, improved, enlarged, extended or repaired shall remain subject to said statutory mortgage lien until payment in full of the principal of and interest upon said bonds. Any holder of any of said bonds or of any of the coupons representing interest accrued thereon, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce said statutory mortgage lien, and may, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings, enforce and compel performance of all duties of the officials of the borrower, including the fixing of sufficient rates, the collection of revenues, the proper segregation of the revenues of the system, and the proper application thereof. Provided, however, that said statutory mortgage lien shall not be construed to give any such bond or coupon holder authority to compel the sale of such system or any part thereof.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 51, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 62-206; W.S. 1957, § 37-113.

Cross references. —

As to mandamus generally, see §

1-30-101

et seq.

§ 37-7-207.
Appointment of receiver in case of default upon bonds.

If there be any default in the payment of the principal of or interest upon any of said bonds, any court having jurisdiction in any proper action may appoint a receiver to administer and operate the system so encumbered on behalf of the borrower with power to fix and charge rates and collect revenues sufficient to provide for the payment of any bonds or other obligations outstanding against said system and for the payment of the expenses of operating and maintaining the same and to apply the income and revenues of said system in conformity with this act [§§

37-7-201

through

37-7-212

] and the order providing for the issuance of such bonds.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 51, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 62-207; W.S. 1957, § 37-114.

Cross references. —

As to receivers generally, see §§

1-33-103

to

1-33-110

.

§ 37-7-208.
Bonds and coupons held by governmental agencies exempt from taxes.

The bonds and interest coupons issued hereunder are hereby exempted from any and all state, county, municipal and other taxation whatsoever under the laws of the state of Wyoming, and it shall be plainly stated on the face of each such bond as follows: “The principal of and interest on this bond are exempted from any and all state, county and municipal and other taxation whatsoever under the laws of the state of Wyoming, provided, however, that this exemption shall apply only to such bonds and coupons owned and held by the public works administration or other governmental agencies.”

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 51, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 62-208; W.S. 1957, § 37-115.

Cross references. —

As to taxation of public utilities generally, see §

39-13-102

.

§ 37-7-209.
Bonds negotiable instruments.

Such bonds shall have all the qualities of negotiable instruments under the law merchant and the Negotiable Instruments Law.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 51, § 9; C.S. 1945, § 62-209; W.S. 1957, § 37-116.

Editor's notes. —

The Negotiable Instruments Law, former §§ 13-280 to 13-475, W.S. 1957, was repealed by § 10-101, ch. 219, Laws 1961. For present provision as to commercial paper, see §§ 34.1-3-101 to 34.1-3-905.

§ 37-7-210.
Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds; funds to be used only on system; unexpended balance; purchase and cancellation of bonds.

The commissioners of any such power district shall require that the proceeds of the sale of bonds issued under the provisions of this act [§§

37-7-201

through

37-7-212

] be deposited in a special account or accounts in a bank or banks which are members of the federal reserve system, and shall require, insofar as practicable, that each such deposit be secured by the United States government securities having an aggregate market value at least equal to the sum at the time on deposit, or, in any event, the proceeds shall be deposited in some bank or other depository, either within or without the state, which will secure such deposit satisfactorily to said governing body. All moneys received from any such bonds shall be used solely for the purchase, construction, improvement, enlargement, extension or repair of the system for which issued, including any engineering, legal and other expenses incident thereto; provided, however, that such moneys may be used also to advance the payment of the interest on such bonds during the first three (3) years following the date of such bonds. Provided, that any unexpended balance of the proceeds of the sale of any such bonds remaining after the completion of the project for which issued shall be paid immediately into the bond and interest redemption fund for such bonds, and the same shall be used only for the payment of the principal of the bonds, and interest for the first three (3) years following the date of the bonds, or, in the alternative, to acquire outstanding bonds of the general issue from which the proceeds were derived, by purchase of such bonds at a price (exclusive of accrued interest) not exceeding the face amount thereof. Any bonds so acquired by purchase shall be cancelled and shall not be reissued.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 51, § 10; C.S. 1945, § 62-210; W.S. 1957, § 37-117.

§ 37-7-211.
Rates for services.

Rates for services furnished by any such system shall be fixed precedent to the issuance of the bonds. Such rates shall be sufficient to provide for the payment of the interest upon and the principal of all such bonds as and when the same become due and payable, to create a bond and interest redemption fund therefor, to provide for the payment of the expenses of administration and operation and such expenses for maintenance of the system necessary to preserve the same in good repair and working order, to build up a reserve for depreciation of the existing system, and to build up a reserve for improvements, betterments and extensions to the existing system other than those necessary to maintain the same in good repair and working order as hereinbefore in this section provided. Such rates shall be fixed and revised from time to time so as to produce these amounts, and the court in its order authorizing the issuance of said revenue bonds shall empower and direct the commissioners of such power district to agree in and by the terms of said revenue bonds, and on the face of each bond at all times to maintain such rates for services furnished by such system as shall be sufficient to provide for the foregoing.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 51, § 11; C.S. 1945, § 62-211; W.S. 1957, § 37-118.

§ 37-7-212.
Authority of district court concerning bonds; bonds to comply with federal laws; power system; state property.

The district court having jurisdiction over said power district shall have general, full, and complete authority to authorize the issuance of such revenue bonds, to make such order and decree from time to time as may be necessary to provide for the raising and accumulation of sufficient revenue and funds for the payment of all principal and interest on said bonds, as same becomes due and payable and after any order or decree shall have been made by any district court of this state authorizing the issuance of any revenue bonds under this act [§§

37-7-201

through

37-7-212

], such district court shall retain jurisdiction until all of said bonds and the principal and interest thereon shall have been paid in full, to appoint a receiver on the application or petition of the owner or owners of said bonds or any of them, to collect the rates due said power district for services furnished and to conserve the same and apply the same to the payment of said bonded indebtedness, principal and interest, under the orders of such court; and in all such matters the court shall be deemed to have general jurisdiction to do any and all things necessary to carry out the intent and purpose of this act and to so provide that the principal and interest on bonds issued hereunder shall be paid in full out of the revenue from the system or power plant or plants. It is the intent of this act, and there is hereby granted to the district court such complete and full jurisdiction and powers over such proceedings and bond issues that the district court in authorizing the issuance of any such bonds may provide therein such terms and conditions as will fully comply with any federal law or laws of the United States of America relating thereto, and particularly with the statute or statutes relating to public works so-called and revenue bonds to be issued for such purposes as well as with any federal law or laws appertaining to the reconstruction finance corporation and its powers. Any such power system or plant, electric light plant, power plant, power lines, transmission lines, distributing system, or other property shall be the property of the state of Wyoming and under its authority and control for the benefit of the users of the electric power developed or distributed thereby.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 51, § 12; C.S. 1945, § 62-212; W.S. 1957, § 37-119.